New York, session 2025-2026, S3458.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph h of subdivision 2 of section 355 of the educa- 2 tion law is amended by adding a new subparagraph 11 to read as follows: 3 (11) (i) Beginning in the two thousand twenty-six--two thousand twen- 4 ty-seven academic year, all current and future mandatory university 5 fees, with the exclusion of the graduate student association student 6 activity fee, shall be charged to a state university of New York gradu- 7 ate student serving a full-time or half-time appointment as a graduate 8 teaching assistant, graduate assistant, graduate research assistant, 9 graduate research associate, or graduate teaching associate at the rate 10 of twenty-five percent of all mandatory university fees, with the exclu- 11 sion of the graduate student association student activity fee. 12 (ii) Beginning in the two thousand twenty-seven--two thousand twenty- 13 eight academic year and thereafter, no mandatory university fees shall 14 be charged, with the exclusion of the graduate student association 15 student activity fee. 16 § 2. Section 6206 of the education law is amended by adding a new 17 subdivision 24 to read as follows: 18 24. a. Beginning in the two thousand twenty-six--two thousand twenty- 19 seven academic year, all current and future mandatory university fees, 20 with the exclusion of the graduate student association student activity 21 fee, shall be charged to a city university of New York graduate student 22 serving as a graduate assistant, adjunct instructor, adjunct lecturer, 23 adjunct college laboratory technician or a non-teaching adjunct staff 24 member at the rate of twenty-five percent of all mandatory university EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07787-01-5 S. 3458 2 1 fees, with the exclusion of the graduate student association student 2 activity fee. 3 b. Beginning in the two thousand twenty-seven--two thousand twenty- 4 eight academic year and thereafter, no mandatory university fees shall 5 be charged, with the exclusion of the graduate student association 6 student activity fee. 7 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.